Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 6
JUDICIAL RELIEF

7-121-601. Judicial relief.

If for any reason it is impractical or impossible for any nonprofit corporation to call or conduct a meeting of its members, delegates, or directors, or otherwise obtain their consent, in the manner prescribed by articles 121 to 137 of this title, its articles of incorporation, or bylaws, then upon petition of a director, officer, delegate, or member the district court for the county in this state in which the street address of the nonprofit corporation's principal office is located, or if the nonprofit corporation has no principal office in this state, the district court for the county in which the street address of its registered agent is located, or if the nonprofit corporation has no registered agent, the district court for the city and county of Denver, may order that such a meeting be called or that a written consent or other form of obtaining the vote of members, delegates, or directors be authorized, in such a manner as the court finds fair and equitable under the circumstances.

The court shall, in an order issued pursuant to this section, provide for a method of notice reasonably designed to give actual notice to all persons who would be entitled to notice of a meeting held pursuant to articles 121 to 137 of this title, the articles of incorporation, or bylaws and whether or not the method results in actual notice to all such persons or conforms to the notice requirements that would otherwise apply. In a proceeding under this section, the court may determine who the members or directors are.

The order issued pursuant to this section may dispense with any requirement relating to the holding of or voting at meetings or obtaining votes, including any requirement as to quorums or as to the number or percentage of votes needed for approval, that would otherwise be imposed by articles 121 to 137 of this title, the articles of incorporation, or bylaws.

Whenever practical, any order issued pursuant to this section shall limit the subject matter of meetings or other forms of consent authorized to items, including amendments to the articles of incorporation or bylaws, the resolution of which will or may enable the nonprofit corporation to continue managing its affairs without further resort to this section; except that an order under this section may also authorize the obtaining of whatever votes and approvals are necessary for the dissolution, merger, or sale of assets.

Any meeting or other method of obtaining the vote of members, delegates, or directors conducted pursuant to an order issued under this section and that complies with all the provisions of such order is for all purposes a valid meeting or vote, as the case may be, and shall have the same force and effect as if it complied with every requirement imposed by articles 121 to 137 of this title, the articles of incorporation, or bylaws.

Court ordered meetings may also be held pursuant to section 7-127-103.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 659, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2335, § 282, effective July 1, 2004.